Maine, session 132, LD140.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §683, sub-§1-B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 343, Pt. H, §2, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
1-B. Additional exemption; inflation adjustment. A homestead eligible for an
exemption under subsection 1 is eligible for an additional exemption as provided in this
subsection:
A. For property tax years beginning before April 1, 2016, $5,000 of the just value of
the homestead;
B. For property tax years beginning April 1, 2017, April 1, 2018 and April 1, 2019,
$10,000 of the just value of the homestead;
C. For property tax years beginning April 1, 2020, April 1, 2021, April 1, 2022, April
1, 2023, April 1, 2024 and April 1, 2025, $15,000 of the just value of the homestead;
and
D. For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2026, $10,000 of the just value
of the homestead for each property tax year in addition to the amount under paragraph
C, until the additional exemption under this subsection is equal to $85,000.
Beginning with property tax years beginning April 1, 2033, the State Tax Assessor annually
shall multiply the amount of the exemption under this subsection and subsection 1 by the
cost-of-living adjustment. For the purposes of this section, "cost-of-living adjustment"
means the Chained Consumer Price Index, as defined in section 5402, subsection 1, for the
12-month period ending June 30th of the preceding calendar year divided by the Chained
Consumer Price Index for the 12-month period ending June 30, 2032.